dev/gsoc2011/monodix/noun/noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="বাঘ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="বাঘ"><i>বাঘ</i><par n="বাঘ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সিংহ"><i>সিংহ</i><par n="বাঘ__n_m"/></e>
